Washington statutes.
RCW 35.90.050

Authority retained by cities.

Cities whose general business licenses are issued through the business licensing system retain the authority to set license fees, provide exemptions and thresholds for these licenses, approve or deny license applicants, and take appropriate administrative actions against licensees.

[ 2017 c 209 s 5.]